Alabama, session 2026rs, HB412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-42-110.01, Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§45-42-110.01
(a) This section shall apply only to Limestone County.
(b)(a)(1) Each member of the Limestone County Board of
Registrars shall be entitled to receive an additional expense
allowance in the amount of fifteen dollars ($15) per day of an
amount established by the county commission through
resolution, for each day when the board is authorized to meet
and conduct business. The county commission may change or
amend the amount of the allowance through passing a subsequent
resolution. The expense allowance provided for in this
sectionsubsection shall be in addition to any and all other
compensation, salary, and expense allowance provided by law
and shall be paid out of the county general fund.
(c)(2) The operation of this sectionsubsection shall be
retroactive to October 1, 2001, and all actions and payments
made to the board on and after that date are hereby ratified
and confirmed.
(b) Beginning on the effective date of this act, the
Page 1

(b) Beginning on the effective date of this act, the
HB412 Enrolled
Limestone County Commission shall establish, by resolution, an
expense allowance for members of the board of registrars in an
amount determined by the commission. This subsection
supersedes subsection (a), and on the effective date of this
act, the expense allowance in subsection (a) shall be void.
The expense allowance provided for in this subsection shall be
in addition to any and all other compensation, salary, and
expense allowance provided by law and shall be paid out of the
county general fund."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB412 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 17-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 03-Mar-26 Passed



Page 3